Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-3202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act:

(1) Affiliate means any person that controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with, another person;

(2) AMC appraiser means a person who holds a valid credential or equivalent to appraise real estate and real property under the laws of this state or another jurisdiction, and holds the status of active on the Appraiser Registry of the Appraisal Subcommittee of the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council in one or more jurisdictions;

(3) AMC Registry means the registry of appraisal management companies that hold a registration as an appraisal management company issued by the board or the equivalent issued in another jurisdiction, and federally regulated appraisal management companies, maintained by the Appraisal Subcommittee;

(4) AMC rule means, collectively, the rules adopted by the federal agencies as required in section 1124 of the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, as such rules existed on January 1, 2024;

(5) Appraisal has the same meaning as in section 76-2204;

(6) Appraisal management company means a person that:

(a) Provides appraisal management services to creditors or to secondary mortgage market participants, including affiliates;

(b) Provides appraisal management services in connection with valuing a consumer's principal dwelling as security for a consumer credit transaction or incorporating such transactions into securitizations; and

(c) Within a twelve-month period, oversees an appraiser panel of:

(i) More than fifteen AMC appraisers in this state; or

(ii) Twenty-five or more AMC appraisers in two or more jurisdictions;

(7) Appraisal management services means one or more of the following:

(a) To recruit, select, and retain AMC appraisers;

(b) To contract with AMC appraisers to perform assignments;

(c) To manage the process of having an appraisal performed, including providing administrative services such as receiving appraisal orders and reports, submitting completed reports to creditors and secondary mortgage market participants, collecting fees from creditors and secondary mortgage market participants for services provided, and paying AMC appraisers for valuation services performed; or

(d) To review and verify the work of AMC appraisers;

(8) Appraisal Subcommittee means the Appraisal Subcommittee of the Federal Financial Institutions Examination Council;

(9) Appraiser panel means a network, list, or roster of AMC appraisers approved by an appraisal management company to perform appraisals as independent contractors for the appraisal management company;

(10) Assignment has the same meaning as in section 76-2207.01;

(11) Board has the same meaning as in section 76-2207.18;

(12) Consumer credit means credit offered or extended to a consumer primarily for personal, family, or household purposes;

(13) Contact person means a person designated by the appraisal management company as the main contact for all communication between the appraisal management company and the board;

(14) Covered transaction means any consumer credit transaction secured by the consumer's principal dwelling;

(15) Credential has the same meaning as in section 76-2207.25;

(16) Creditor means a person who regularly extends consumer credit that is subject to a finance charge or is payable by written agreement in more than four installments, not including a downpayment, and to whom the obligation is initially payable, either on the face of the note or contract or by agreement when there is no note or contract. A person regularly extends consumer credit if:

(a) The person extended credit, other than credit subject to the requirements of 12 C.F.R. 1026.32, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2019, more than five times for transactions secured by a dwelling in the preceding calendar year, or in the current calendar year if a person did not meet these standards in the preceding calendar year; and

(b) In any twelve-month period, the person originates more than one credit extension that is subject to the requirements of 12 C.F.R. 1026.32, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2019, or one or more such credit extensions through a mortgage broker;

(17) Dwelling means a residential structure that contains one to four units, whether or not that structure is attached to real property, including an individual condominium unit, cooperative unit, mobile home, or trailer if used as a residence. With respect to a dwelling:

(a) A consumer may have only one principal dwelling at a time;

(b) A vacation or secondary dwelling is not a principal dwelling; and

(c) A dwelling bought or built by a consumer with the intention of that dwelling becoming the consumer's principal dwelling within one year, or upon completion of construction, is considered to be the consumer's principal dwelling for the purpose of the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act;

(18) Federally regulated appraisal management company means an appraisal management company that is:

(a) Owned and controlled by an insured depository institution as defined in 12 U.S.C. 1813, as such section existed on January 1, 2024; and

(b) Regulated by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or the successor of any such agencies;

(19) Federal agencies means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the National Credit Union Administration, the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, the Federal Housing Finance Agency, or the successor of any of such agencies;

(20) Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989 has the same meaning as in section 76-2207.30;

(21) Independent contractor means a person established as an independent contractor by the appraisal management company for the purpose of federal income taxation;

(22) Jurisdiction has the same meaning as in section 76-2207.32;

(23) Person has the same meaning as in section 76-2213.02;

(24) Real estate has the same meaning as in section 76-2214;

(25) Real property has the same meaning as in section 76-2214.01;

(26) Real property appraisal practice has the same meaning as in section 76-2215;

(27) Real property appraiser has the same meaning as in section 76-2216;

(28) Registration means a registration as an appraisal management company in this state issued by the board if all requirements for approval as an appraisal management company required in the Nebraska Appraisal Management Company Registration Act have been met by a person making application to the board, including the submission of all required fees, and the board has granted all rights to the person to operate as an appraisal management company in this state as allowed under the act;

(29) Report has the same meaning as in section 76-2216.02;

(30) Secondary mortgage market participant means a guarantor or insurer of mortgage-backed securities, or an underwriter or issuer of mortgage-backed securities, and only includes an individual investor in a mortgage-backed security if that investor also serves in the capacity of a guarantor, insurer, underwriter, or issuer for the mortgage-backed security;

(31) Uniform Standards of Professional Appraisal Practice has the same meaning as in section 76-2218.02; and

(32) Valuation services has the same meaning as in section 76-2219.01.

Laws 2011, LB410, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 72;

Laws 2018, LB17, § 3;

Laws 2019, LB77, § 11;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 89;

Laws 2024, LB989, § 4.